Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1077
Counterclaim; injunction upon.

A defendant may obtain an injunction upon an answer in the nature of a counterclaim. He shall proceed in the manner prescribed in sections 25-1062 to 25-1080.

R.S.1867, Code § 265, p. 437;

R.S.1913, § 7806;

C.S.1922, § 8750;

C.S.1929, § 20-1077;

R.S.1943, § 25-1077.